sk-SK: Tvar žiarovky: Tvar písmena A; Guľka; Sviečka; Edison; Glóbus; PAR; Reflektor; Špirálový; Rúrka; Iné
ro-RO: Formă bec: În formă de A; Sub formă de glonț; Sub formă de lumânare; Edison; Glob; PAR; Reflector; Spiralat; Tub; Altele
pt-BR: Formato da lâmpada: Forma de A; Marcador; Vela; Edison; Globo; PAR; Refletor; Espiral; Tubo; Outro
pl: Kształt żarówki: Kształt litery A; jednorazowo; Świeca; Edison; Globus; PAR; Reflektor; Spiralny; Świetlówka; Pozostałe
de: Leuchtmittelform: A-förmig; Kugel; Kerze; Edison; Kugelförmig; PAR; Reflektor; Spirale; Rohr; Sonstiges
el: Σχήμα λαμπτήρα: Σχήμα Α; Με σχήμα μυτερού κώνου; Κερί; Edison; Γλόμπος; PAR; Ανακλαστήρας; Σπιράλ; Μακαρόνι; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oblika žarnice: A-oblika; Koničasta; Sveča; Edison; Globusna; PAR; Reflektorska; Spiralna; Cevasta; Druga
it: Forma della lampadina: A forma di A; Proiettile; Candela; Edison; Globo; PAR; Riflettore; Spirale; Tubo; Altro
fr: Forme de l’ampoule: Trapèze; Balle; Bougie; Edison; Globe; PAR; Réflecteur; Spirale; Tube; Autre
tr: Ampul şekli: A Şekli; Kurşun; Mum; Edison; Dünya; PAR; Reflektör; Sarmal; Tüp; Diğer
ko: 전구 모양: A형; 불릿; 양초; 에디슨; 구체; PAR; 반사기; 스프링; 튜브; 기타
ja: 電球の形状: A型; 弾丸; キャンドル; エジソン; グローブ; PAR; 反射板; スパイラル; チューブ; その他
fi: Polttimon muoto: A-muoto; Luoti; Kynttilä; Edison; Maapallo; PAR; Heijastin; Kierre; Putkilo; Muu
bg-BG: Форма на крушка: А-образна форма; Куршум; Свещ; Едисон; Глобус; PAR; Отразител; Спирала; Тръба; Други
ru: Форма лампы: A-образный; Пуля; Свеча; Эдисона; Круглая; PAR; Отражатель; Спиральная; Трубка; Другая
hr-HR: Oblik žarulje: A-oblik; U obliku metka; Svijeća; Edison; Okrugla; PAR; Reflektor; Spirala; Duguljasta; Ostalo
nb: Pæreform: A-form; Kule; Stearinlys; Edison; Klode; PAR; Reflektor; Spiral; Slange; Annen
vi: Hình dạng bóng đèn: Hình chữ A; Đạn; Nến; Hình bóng đèn Edison; Hình cầu; PAR; Phản xạ; Xoắn ốc; Ống; Khác
da: Pæreform: A-form; Kugle; Stearinlys; Edison; Globus; PAR; Refleks; Spiral; Tube; Andet
es: Forma de la bombilla: En forma de A; Viñeta; Vela; Edison; Globo; PAR; Reflector; Espiral; Tubo; Otros
pt-PT: Formato da lâmpada: Em forma de A; Ponto; Vela; Edison; Globo; PAR; Refletor; Em espiral; Tubo; Outro
zh-CN: 灯泡形状: A 形; 子弹; 蜡烛; 爱迪生; 球状; PAR; 反光面; 螺旋; 管状滑道; 其他
cs: Tvar žárovky: Tvar písmene A; Kulová; Svíčka; Edison; Zeměkoule; PAR; Reflektor; Spirála; Tuba; Jiné
sv: Form på glödlampa: A-form; Kula; Ljus; Edison; Glob; PAR; Reflektor; Spiral; Tub; Annat
lt-LT: Lemputės forma: A formos; Kulkos formos; Žvakutės formos; Edisono; Apvali; PAR; Kūgio formos; Spiralinė; Vamzdelis; Kita
en: Bulb shape: A-shape; Bullet; Candle; Edison; Globe; PAR; Reflector; Spiral; Tube; Other
nl: Lampvorm: A-vorm; Bullet; Kaars; Edison; Wereldbol; PAR; Reflector; Spiraal; Tube; Andere
th: รูปทรงของหลอดไฟ: รูปตัว A; กระสุน; เทียน; หลอดไฟเอดิสัน; โกลบ; PAR; แผ่นสะท้อนแสง; แบบเกลียว; หลอด; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 燈泡形狀: A 形; 子彈; 蠟燭; 愛迪生; 地球; PAR; 反射鏡; 螺旋式; 管狀; 其他
hu: Izzó alakja: Körte; Csepp; Gyertya; Edison; Gömb; PAR; Reflektor; Spirál; Cső; Egyéb